Florida, session 2026, SB362.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 24 39.201, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (f) is added 25 to subsection (3) of that section, to read: 26 39.201âRequired reports of child abuse, abandonment, or 27 neglect, sexual abuse of a child, and juvenile sexual abuse; 28 required reports of death; reports involving a child who has 29 exhibited inappropriate sexual behavior.â 30 (1)âMANDATORY REPORTING.â 31 (a)1.âA person is required to report immediately to the 32 central abuse hotline established in s. 39.101, in writing, 33 through a call to the toll-free telephone number, or through 34 electronic reporting, if he or she knows, or has reasonable 35 cause to suspect, that any of the following has occurred: 36 a.âChild abuse, abandonment, or neglect by a parent or 37 caregiver, which includes, but is not limited to, when a child 38 is abused, abandoned, or neglected by a parent, legal custodian, 39 caregiver, or other person responsible for the childâs welfare 40 or when a child is in need of supervision and care and has no 41 parent, legal custodian, or responsible adult relative 42 immediately known and available to provide such supervision and 43 care. 44 b.âChild abuse by an adult other than a parent, legal 45 custodian, caregiver, or other person responsible for the 46 childâs welfare. The central abuse hotline must immediately 47 electronically transfer such reports to the appropriate county 48 sheriffâs office or local law enforcement agency. 49 2.âAny person who knows, or has reasonable cause to 50 suspect, that a child is the victim of sexual abuse or juvenile 51 sexual abuse shall report such knowledge or suspicion to the 52 central abuse hotline, including if the alleged incident 53 involves a child who is in the custody of or under the 54 protective supervision of the department. 55 3.âAny person who knows, or has reasonable cause to 56 suspect, that a child has been born to a parent who has another 57 child who is in the custody of or under the protective 58 supervision of the department shall report such knowledge or 59 suspicion to the central abuse hotline. 60 61 Such reports may be made in writing, through the statewide toll 62 free telephone number, or through electronic reporting. 63 (3)âADDITIONAL CIRCUMSTANCES RELATED TO REPORTS.â 64 (f)âChildren born to certain parents.â 65 1.âThe central abuse hotline must accept reports alleging 66 that a child has been born to a parent who has another child who 67 is in the custody of or under the protective supervision of the 68 department. Such reports require an immediate onsite protective 69 investigation and the central abuse hotline shall immediately 70 notify the departmentâs designated district staff responsible 71 for protective investigations to ensure that an onsite 72 protective investigation is promptly initiated. 73 2.âThere is a rebuttable presumption that a child born to a 74 parent who has another child in the custody of or under the 75 protective supervision of the department is in immediate danger 76 of abuse, abandonment, or neglect. A parent may rebut such 77 presumption by providing to the department evidence that the 78 parent is successfully participating in department or court 79 ordered services or other evidence as required by the 80 department. 81 3.âIf the department determines that the rebuttable 82 presumption has been rebutted and there is not an immediate 83 threat to the childâs well-being or safety, the department must 84 maintain a record that includes any previous allegations, 85 complaints, or petitions against the parent and the evidence 86 that the department relied upon in determining that the parent 87 rebutted the presumption. 88 4.âIf the presumption is not rebutted and a child is taken 89 into the custody of the department after a protective 90 investigation is conducted under s. 39.301, the department may 91 not return the child to the parentâs custody until all of the 92 following have occurred: 93 a.âA guardian ad litem is appointed for the child. 94 b.âThe department has conducted a full protective 95 investigation pursuant to this chapter and the results of the 96 protective investigation, including any previous allegations, 97 complaints, or petitions of abuse, abandonment, or neglect 98 against the parent, have been presented to the court at the 99 shelter hearing. 100 c.âThe court determines by a preponderance of the evidence 101 that the child will be provided a safe home and there is not an 102 immediate threat to the childâs well-being or safety. 103 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.